Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium
beginning July 1,  2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Patrol and Public Safety
Services, Criminal
Investigation and Gaming
Enforcement ............................. $318,927,920
(2) Fish and Wildlife ....................... $ 15,606,809
(3) Forensic Services and
Office of the Chief
Medical Examiner ..................... $ 77,079,948
(4) Office of the Superintendent,
Support Services and Criminal
Justice Info Services ................. $109,709,659
(5) Bond Debt Service .................... $ 26,599,164
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  State
Police, for the following purposes:
(1) Patrol and Public Safety
Services, Criminal
Investigation and Gaming
Enforcement ............................. $ 54,230,597
(2) Fish and Wildlife ....................... $ 35,108,856
(3) Forensic Services and
Office of the Chief Medical
Examiner................................... $ 2,475,562
(4) Office of the Superintendent,
Support Services and Criminal
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 1
Justice Info Services ................. $ 41,575,877
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Police for
the following purposes:
(1) Patrol and Public Safety
Services and Criminal
Investigation ............................. $ 3,329,825
(2) Fish and Wildlife ....................... $ 3,178,801
(3) Forensic Services ...................... $ 4,197,550
(4) Support Services and Criminal
Justice Info Services ................. $ 5,934,396
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$11,900,423 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife enforcement activities.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of State Police  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Department of State Police, for deferred main-
tenance, capital project costs and safety improvements.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5029 (HB 5029-A) Page 2